California, session 20252026, SB758.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22984 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22984. (a) A retailer shall not sell nitrous oxide, as defined in Section 381c of the Penal Code, at a retail location. For purposes of this section, a retailer does not include a grocery store or a general retail merchandise store with a grocery department, as defined in Section 7100 of the Civil Code. Code, except that a retailer includes a convenience store.(b) A city or county, or city and county, may adopt an ordinance imposing greater restrictions on the retail sale of nitrous oxide than those imposed by this section provided that the ordinance does not restrict legitimate uses, including, but not limited to, dentistry, food preparation, and automotive services.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.